Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 758.535 is amended to read:
758.535. (1) The Public Utility Commission shall establish minimum criteria that a cogeneration
facility or small power production facility must meet to  qualify as a qualifying facility under ORS
543.610, 757.005 and 758.505 to 758.555.
(2) The terms and  conditions for the purchase of energy or energy and capacity from a qualify-
ing facility shall:
(a) Be established by rule by the commission if the purchase is by a public utility;
(b) Be adopted by an electric cooperative or people’s utility district according  to the applicable
provision of ORS chapter 62 or 261; and
(c) Be established by a municipal utility according to the requirements of the municipality’s
charter and ordinance.
(3) The rules or policies adopted under subsection (2) of this section also shall:
(a) Establish safety  and operating requirements necessary to adequately protect all systems, fa-
cilities and equipment of the electric utility and qualifying facility;
(b) Establish the eligibility cap for  standard avoided costs rates and contracts for the
purchase of energy or energy and capacity from qualifying facilities at no less  than 10
megawatts;
[(b)] (c) Be consistent with applicable standards required by the Public Utility  Regulatory Poli-
cies Act of 1978 (P.L. 95-617); and
[(c)] (d) Be made available to the public at the commission’s office.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3863 (HB 3863-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3863 (HB 3863-INTRO) Page 2